th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เรือ > เครื่องยนต์และมอเตอร์เรือ: มอเตอร์ในเรือ; มอเตอร์นอกเรือ; มอเตอร์เรือเล็ก
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Bộ phận & linh kiện tàu thuyền > Động cơ & Mô-tơ tàu thủy: Động cơ bên trong; Động cơ phía ngoài; Động cơ Trolling
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Su Jetli Tekne Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Tekne Motorları: İçten Takmalı Motorlar; Dıştan Takma Motorlar; Trol Motorları
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Delar och tillbehör till fartyg > Fartygsmotorer: Inombordsmotorer; Utombordsmotorer; Trollingmotorer
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly a příslušenství k motorovým člunům > Motory motorových člunů: Vestavěné motory; Závěsné motory; Trollingové motory
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele og tilbehør til fartøjer > Motorer til fartøjer: Indenbordsmotorer; Påhængsmotorer; Trollingmotorer
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijármű-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijármű-motorok: Belső motorok; Külső motorok; Villanymotorok
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées et accessoires nautiques > Moteurs nautiques: Moteurs in-bord; Moteurs hors-bord; Moteurs à traîne
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Båtdeler og -tilbehør > Båtmotorer: Innenbordsmotorer; Utenbordsmotorer; Trollingmotorer
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese și accesorii pentru ambarcațiuni > Motoare ambarcațiuni: Motoare la bord; Motoare exterioare; Motoare troliu
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Запчасти и аксессуары для водного транспорта > Двигатели и моторы для водного транспорта: Стационарные моторы; Подвесные моторы; Троллинговые электромоторы
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶用エンジン・モーター: 船内機; 船外機; トローリングモーター
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių varikliai: Vidiniai varikliai; Užbortiniai varikliai; Blizgiavimo varikliai
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre plavidlá > Motory pre plavidlá: Vnútorné motory; Prívesné motory; Trollingové motory
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças e acessórios para embarcações > Motores de embarcações: Motores internos; Motores de popa; Motores de pesca
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ για σκάφη > Μηχανές & κινητήρες σκαφών: Εσωτερικοί κινητήρες; Εξωλέμβιοι κινητήρες; Κινητήρες για αλιεία με συρτή
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船舶引擎/发动机: 舷内机; 舷外机; 拖曳马达
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Onderdelen en accessoirs voor vaartuigen > Motoren voor vaartuigen: Binnenboordmotoren; Buitenboordmotoren; Trollingmotoren
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Acessórios e peças para embarcações > Motores para embarcações: Motores de centro com eixo; Motores de popa; Motores de corrico
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Engines & Motors: Inboard Motors; Outboard Motors; Trolling Motors
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Accesorios y piezas para embarcaciones > Motores y engranajes para embarcaciones: Motores intraborda; Motores fueraborda; Motores para pesca de arrastre
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi i dodaci za plovila > Motori za plovila: Unutarbrodski motori; Vanbrodski motori; Trolling motori
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli in dodatki za vodna plovila > Motorji in pogonske enote za vodna plovila: Notranji motorji; Zunanji motorji; Motorji za ribolov
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen moottorit: Sisämoottorit; Perämoottorit; Uistelumoottorit
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части и аксесоари за плавателни съдове > Двигатели и мотори на плавателни съдове: Бордови двигатели; Извънбордови двигатели; Тролинг двигатели
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 선박 부품/부대용품 > 선박 엔진/모터: 선내 모터; 선외 모터; 트롤링 모터
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Parti e accessori imbarcazioni > Motori imbarcazioni: Motori entrobordo; Motori fuoribordo; Motori da traina
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugteile & Zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugantriebe & -motoren: Innenbordmotoren; Außenbordmotoren; Trolling-Motoren
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船艇引擎/馬達: 舷內機; 舷外機; 拖釣船馬達
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części i akcesoria do jednostek pływających > Silniki do jednostek pływających: Silniki zabudowane; Silniki zaburtowe; Silniki trollingowe